Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Department of Education and Early Development.

Administrative Code. —

For pre-elementary (early childhood) school, see 4 AAC 60.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 6-10, 59 et seq.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 74-92.

Modern status of doctrine of sovereign immunity as applied to public schools and institutions of higher learning. 33 ALR3d 703.

Sec. 14.07.010.
Department of Education and Early Development.

The Department of Education and Early Development includes the commissioner of education and early development, the state Board of Education and Early Development, and the staff necessary to carry out the functions of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” and “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Sec. 14.07.020.
Duties of the department.

The department shall

exercise general supervision over the public schools of the state except the University of Alaska;

study the conditions and needs of the public schools of the state, adopt or recommend plans, administer and evaluate grants to improve school performance awarded under AS

14.03.125

, and adopt regulations for the improvement of the public schools; the department may consult with the University of Alaska to develop secondary education requirements to improve student achievement in college preparatory courses;

provide advisory and consultative services to all public school governing bodies and personnel;

prescribe by regulation a minimum course of study for the public schools; the regulations must provide that, if a course in American Sign Language is given, the course shall be given credit as a course in a foreign language;

establish, in coordination with the Department of Health and Social Services, a program for the continuing education of children who are held in juvenile detention facilities or juvenile treatment facilities, as those terms are defined in AS

47.12.990

, in the state during the period of detention or treatment;

accredit those public schools that meet accreditation standards prescribed by regulation by the department; these regulations shall be adopted by the department and presented to the legislature during the first 10 days of any regular session, and become effective 45 days after presentation or at the end of the session, whichever is earlier, unless disapproved by a resolution concurred in by a majority of the members of each house;

prescribe by regulation, after consultation with the state fire marshal and the state sanitarian, standards that will ensure healthful and safe conditions in the public and private schools of the state, including a requirement of physical examinations and immunizations in pre-elementary schools; the standards for private schools may not be more stringent than those for public schools;

exercise general supervision over pre-elementary schools that receive direct state or federal funding;

exercise general supervision over elementary and secondary correspondence study programs offered by municipal school districts or regional educational attendance areas; the department may also offer and make available to any Alaskan through a centralized office a correspondence study program;

accredit private schools that request accreditation and that meet accreditation standards prescribed by regulation by the department; nothing in this paragraph authorizes the department to require religious or other private schools to be licensed;

review plans for construction of new public elementary and secondary schools and for additions to and major rehabilitation of existing public elementary and secondary schools and, in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, determine and approve the extent of eligibility for state aid of a school construction or major maintenance project; for the purposes of this paragraph, “plans” include educational specifications, schematic designs, projected energy consumption and costs, and final contract documents;

provide educational opportunities in the areas of vocational education and training, and basic education to individuals over 16 years of age who are no longer attending school; the department may consult with businesses and labor unions to develop a program to prepare students for apprenticeships or internships that will lead to employment opportunities;

administer the grants awarded under AS 14.11;

establish, in coordination with the Department of Public Safety, a school bus driver training course;

require the reporting of information relating to school disciplinary and safety programs under AS

14.33.120

and of incidents of disruptive or violent behavior;

establish by regulation criteria, based on low student performance, under which the department may intervene in a school district to improve instructional practices, as described in AS

14.07.030(a)(14)

or (15); the regulations must include

a notice provision that alerts the district to the deficiencies and the instructional practice changes proposed by the department;

an end date for departmental intervention, as described in AS

14.07.030(a)(14)

(A) and (B) and (15), after the district demonstrates three consecutive years of improvement consisting of not less than two percent increases in student proficiency on standards-based assessments in language arts and mathematics, as provided in AS

14.03.123(f)(1)(A)

; and

a process for districts to petition the department for continuing or discontinuing the department’s intervention;

notify the legislative committees having jurisdiction over education before intervening in a school district under AS 14.07.030(a)(14) or redirecting public school funding under AS

14.07.030(a)(15)

.

In implementing its duties under (a)(2) of this section, the department may not expend any money to implement the set of educational curriculum standards for grades kindergarten through 12 established by the Common Core Standards Initiative and shall develop

performance standards in language arts and mathematics to be met at designated age levels by each student in public schools in the state; and

a comprehensive system of student assessments, composed of multiple indicators of proficiency in language arts and mathematics; this comprehensive system must

be made available to all districts and regional educational attendance areas;

include a developmental profile for students entering kindergarten or first grade; and

include performance standards in language arts and mathematics for students in age groups five through seven, eight through 10, and 11 — 14.

In this section, “pre-elementary school” means a school for children ages three through five years if the school’s primary function is educational.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 190 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 50 SLA 1977; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 126 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 147 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1979; am § 24 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 1, 2 ch 92 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 11 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 62, § 2 (1986); am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 173 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997; am § 12 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 114 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2008; am §§ 3, 5 ch 11 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 2010; am § 9 ch 8 SLA 2011; am §§ 16, 17 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 9 ch 54 SLA 2016; am § 9 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c).
Relettered in 1998, at which time former (b) was relettered as (c).

Paragraph (a)(15) was enacted as paragraph (a)(16) and renumbered in 2000.

In 2018, in subsection (a), references to AS

14.07.030

were corrected to reflect the relettering in that section.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

For safe schools, see 4 AAC 6, art. 2.

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For school and district accountability, see 4 AAC 6, art. 5.

For student rights and responsibilities, see 4 AAC 7.

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For evaluation of professional employees, see 4 AAC 19.

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

For exchange teachers and student teachers, see 4 AAC 30.

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

For grants for the improvement of school performance, see 4 AAC 33, art. 2.

For quality school funding grants, see 4 AAC 33, art. 3.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

For public school performance incentive program, see 4 AAC 33, art. 5.

For private schools, see 4 AAC 42.

For secondary vocational educational programs, see 4 AAC 51, art. 3.

For pre-elementary (early childhood) school, see 4 AAC 60.

Effect of amendments. —

The second 2010 amendment, effective September 19, 2010, in (a)(11), added “projected energy consumption and costs,” following “schematic designs,”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(16)(B), substituted “standards-based assessments in language arts and mathematics” for “standards-based assessments in mathematics, reading, and writing” following “student proficiency on”; in (b), rewrote the introductory language, which read, “In implementing its duties under (a)(2) of this section the department shall develop”, in (b)(1) and (b)(2), substituted “language arts” for “reading, writing” in three places.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, in (a)(2), added “the department may consult with the University of Alaska to develop secondary education requirements to improve student achievement in college preparatory courses” at the end of the paragraph; in (a)(7), substituted “ensure” for “assure”; in (a)(12), added “the department may consult with businesses and labor unions to develop a program to prepare students for apprenticeships or internships that will lead to employment opportunities;” at the end of the paragraph; in (a)(16)(B), substituted “AS

14.03.123(f)(1)(A)

” for “AS 14.03.123(f)(2)(A)”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a)(5), substituted “held in juvenile detention facilities or juvenile treatment facilities, as those terms are defined in AS

47.12.990

, in the state during the period of detention or treatment” for “held in detention facilities in the state during the period of detention” near the end.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57(b), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (a) of this section applies to minors subject to AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22, ch. 16, SLA 2021, and AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (a) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The State Board of Education has statutory authority to adopt regulations concerning corporal punishment of students in private schools to the extent necessary to protect the physical health and safety of the children. April 1, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.07.030.
Powers of the department.

The department may

establish, maintain, govern, operate, discontinue, and combine area, regional, and special schools;

enter into contractual agreements with the Bureau of Indian Affairs or with a school district to share boarding costs of secondary school students;

provide for citizenship night schools when and where expedient;

provide for the sale or other disposition of abandoned or obsolete buildings and other state-owned school property;

prescribe a classification for items of expense of school districts;

acquire and transfer personal property, acquire real property, and transfer real property to federal agencies, state agencies, or to political subdivisions;

enter into contractual agreements with school districts to provide more efficient or economical education services; reasonable fees may be charged by the department to cover the costs of providing services under an agreement, including costs for professional services, reproduction or printing, and mailing and distribution of educational materials;

provide for the issuance of elementary and secondary diplomas to persons not in school who have completed the equivalent of an 8th or 12th grade education, respectively, in accordance with standards established by the department;

apply for, accept, and spend endowments, grants, and other private money available to the state for educational purposes in accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act);

set student tuition and fees for educational and extracurricular programs and services provided and schools operated by the department under the provisions of (1) of this section and AS

14.07.020(a)(9)

, (11), and (12);

charge fees to cover the costs of care and handling with respect to the acquisition, warehousing, distribution, or transfer of donated foods;

establish and collect fees for the rental of school facilities and for other programs and services provided by the schools;

develop a model curriculum and provide technical assistance for early childhood education programs;

notwithstanding any other provision of this title, intervene in a school district to improve instructional practices under standards established by the department in regulation, including directing the

employees identified by the department to exercise supervisory authority for instructional practices in the district or in a specified school;

use of appropriations under this title for distribution to a district;

notwithstanding any other provision of this title, redirect public school funding under AS 14.17 appropriated for distribution to a school district, after providing notice to the district and an opportunity for the district to respond, when

necessary to contract for services to improve instructional practices in the district; or

the district has failed to take an action required by the department to improve instructional practices in the district; if funding is redirected under this subparagraph, the department shall provide the redirected funding to the district when the department has determined that the required action is satisfactorily completed.

The department may not require a school district to review textbooks, instructional materials, or curricula more frequently than once every 10 years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1968; am §§ 2, 3, 34 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 161 SLA 1975; am § 15 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 15 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 173 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, former paragraphs (10)-(14) were renumbered as (9)-(13) to reflect the 1989 repeal of former paragraph (9).

Cross references. —

For pilot project terminating June 30, 2017 authorizing the department to make grants to nonprofit organizations to expand middle school science, technology, mathematics, and engineering education, see sec. 50, ch. 15, SLA 2014.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 28, 2018, added (b).

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is beyond the department’s scope of authority to contract with private schools to provide educational services. March 18, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.07.032.
Definition for AS 14.07.020 — 14.07.032.

In AS

14.07.020

—

14.07.032

, “instructional practices” means the strategies and methods used in teaching or delivering information, skills, material, and student learning management tools to a student to help the student achieve intended educational outcomes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 70 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 70, SLA 2008, makes this section effective June 5, 2008.

Sec. 14.07.035.
Accounting and disposition of receipts. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 14.07.040.
Supplies and equipment for state-operated schools. [Repealed, § 34 ch 46 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.07.050.
Selection of textbooks.

Textbooks for use in the public schools of the state, including a district offered statewide correspondence study program, shall be selected by district boards for district schools. Nothing in this section precludes a correspondence study student, or the parent or guardian of a correspondence study student, from privately obtaining or using textbooks or curriculum material not provided by the school district.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 205 SLA 1970; am § 25 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A book may not be approved for use in publicly provided education if it advocates a partisan, sectarian, or denominational doctrine.
To allow otherwise would permit a school board to advocate partisan, sectarian, and denominational doctrines in a public classroom through textbooks.
September 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.07.052.
State Textbook Commission. [Repealed, § 2 ch 96 SLA 1970.]

Secs. 14.07.053 — 14.07.054.
[Renumbered as AS 14.07.058 — 14.07.059.]

Sec. 14.07.055.
Expenses and per diem. [Repealed, § 19 ch 53 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 14.07.057.
Transmittal of textbook selections.

A school board that selects its own books shall forward a list of the selections to the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Secs. 14.07.058,
14.07.059.
Alaska School Activities Association; activities fund. [Repealed, § 13, ch 43 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 14.07.060.
Regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this title. All regulations shall be adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Administrative Code. —

For state board of education, see 4 AAC 3.

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

For safe schools, see 4 AAC 6, art. 2.

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For school and district accountability, see 4 AAC 6, art. 5.

For student rights and responsibilities, see 4 AAC 7.

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For school operating fund, see 4 AAC 9, art. 2.

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For allowances for professional personnel, see 4 AAC 15.

For employment of professional personnel, see 4 AAC 18.

For evaluation of professional employees, see 4 AAC 19.

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

For exchange teachers and student teachers, see 4 AAC 30.

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

For loss protection, see 4 AAC 31, art. 2.

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

For grants for the improvement of school performance, see 4 AAC 33, art. 2.

For quality school funding grants, see 4 AAC 33, art. 3.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

For public school performance incentive program, see 4 AAC 33, art. 5.

For bilingual-bicultural education, see 4 AAC 34.

For review and appeals of actions and decisions regarding funding, see 4 AAC 40.

For private schools, see 4 AAC 42.

For secondary vocational educational programs, see 4 AAC 51, art. 3.

For program establishment, see 4 AAC 52, art. 1.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

For program administration: gifted children, see 4 AAC 52, art. 3.

For planning and reports, see 4 AAC 57, art. 1.

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

For fees, see 4 AAC 58, art. 1.

For museum assistance grants, see 4 AAC 58, art. 2.

For pre-elementary (early childhood) school, see 4 AAC 60.

For regional resource centers, see 4 AAC 66.

Sec. 14.07.070.
Withholding state funds.

State funds may not be paid to a school district or teacher that fails to comply with the school laws of the state or with the regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.